Massachusetts, session 194th, S1699.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 13A of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the second paragraph and inserting in the
place thereof the following paragraph:-
Any person who operates a motor vehicle without a safety belt, and any person 16 years
of age or over who rides as a passenger in a motor vehicle without wearing a safety belt in
violation of this section, shall be subject to a fine of 50 dollars. Any operator of a motor vehicle
shall be subject to an additional fine of 50 dollars for each person under the age of 16 and no
younger than 12 who is a passenger in said motor vehicle and not wearing a safety belt. The
provisions of this section shall be enforced by law enforcement agencies when an operator of a
motor vehicle or passenger who rides in the motor vehicle is not wearing a safety belt in
of 2

violation of motor vehicle laws. Safety belt violations will not result in surcharges on motor
vehicle insurance premiums, and a police officer may not search or inspect a motor vehicle, its
contents, the driver, or a passenger solely because of a violation of this section. Fees derived
from primary seat belt citations shall be deposited in the Head Injury Treatment Services Trust
Fund established in Section 59 of Chapter 10.
SECTION 2. The provisions of Section 1 shall take effect 180 days from the effective
date of this act.
of 2